en: Olive oils from Seggiano
fr: Huile d'olive de Seggiano
hr: Maslinova ulja od seggiano
it: Olio di oliva Seggiano, Seggiano
nl: Olijfoliën uit Seggiano, Olijfolies uit Seggiano

en: Olive oils from Sicilia
fr: Huile d'olive de Sicilia
hr: Maslinova ulja sa Sicilije
it: Olio di oliva Sicilia
nl: Olijfoliën uit Sicilia, Olijfolies uit Sicilia

en: Olive oils from Tergeste
fr: Huile d'olive de Tergeste
hr: Maslinova ulja iz tergeste
it: Olio di oliva Tergeste, Tergeste
nl: Olijfoliën uit Tergeste, Olijfolies uit Tergeste

en: Olive oils from Terre Aurunche
fr: Huile d'olive de Terre Aurunche
hr: Maslinova ulja iz terre aurunche
it: Olio di oliva Terre Aurunche, Terre Aurunche
nl: Olijfoliën uit Terre Aurunche, Olijfolies uit Terre Aurunche

en: Olive oils from Terra di Bari
fr: Huile d'olive Terra di Bari
hr: Maslinova ulja iz terra di bari
it: Olio di oliva di Terra di Bari
nl: Olijfoliën uit Terra di Bari

en: Olive oils from Terre di Siena
fr: Huile d'olive Terre di Siena
hr: Maslinova ulja iz terre di Siene
it: Olio di oliva di Terre di Siena
nl: Olijfoliën uit Terre di Siena, Olijfolies uit Terre di Siena

en: Olive oils from Terra d'Otranto
fr: Huile d'olive Terra d'Otranto
hr: Maslinova ulja s terra d'otranta
it: Olio di oliva di Terra d'Otranto
nl: Olijfoliën uit Terra d'Otranto, Olijfolies ui Terra d'Otranto

en: Olive oils from Terre Tarentine
fr: Huile d'olive de Terre Tarentine
hr: Maslinova ulja iz terre tarentine
it: Olio di oliva Terre Tarentine, Terre Tarentine
nl: Olijfoliën uit Terre Tarentine, Olijfolies uit Terre Tarentine

en: Olive oils from Toscano
fr: Huile d'olive de Toscano
hr: Maslinova ulja iz Toskane
it: Olio di oliva Toscano
nl: Olijfoliën uit Toscano, Olijfolies uit Toscano

en: Olive oils from Tuscia
fr: Huile d'olive de Tuscia
hr: Maslinova ulja iz tuscie
it: Olio di oliva Tuscia, Tuscia
nl: Olijfoliën uit Tuscia, Olijfolies uit Tuscia

en: Olive oils from Umbria
fr: Huile d'olive de Umbria
hr: Maslinova ulja iz Umbrije
it: Olio di oliva Umbria
nl: Olijfoliën uit Umbria, Olijfolies uit Umbria

en: Olive oils from Valdemone
fr: Huile d'olive de Valdemone
hr: Maslinova ulja iz valdemona
it: Olio di oliva Valdemone, Valdemone
nl: Olijfoliën uit Valdemone, Olijfolies uit Valdemone

en: Olive oils from Val di Mazara
fr: Huile d'olive de Val di Mazara
hr: Maslinova ulja iz val di mazara
it: Olio di oliva Val di Mazara, Val di Mazara
nl: Olijfoliën uit Val di Mazara, Olijfolies uit Val di Mazara

en: Olive oils from Valle del Belice
fr: Huile d'olive de Valle del Belice
hr: Maslinova ulja iz Valle del Belice
it: Olio di oliva Valle del Belice, Valle del Belice
nl: Olijfoliën uit Valle del Belice, Olijfolies uit Valle del Belice

en: Olive oils from Valli Trapanesi
fr: Huile d'olive de Valli Trapanesi
hr: Maslinova ulja iz valli trapanesi
it: Olio di oliva Valli Trapanesi, Valli Trapanesi
nl: Olijfoliën uit Valli Trapanesi, Olijfolies uit Valli Trapanesi

en: Olive oils from Veneto
fr: Huile d'olive de Veneto
hr: Maslinova ulja iz Veneta
it: Olio di oliva Veneto
nl: Olijfoliën uit Veneto

en: Olive oils from Veneto Valpolicella
fr: Huile d'olive de Veneto Valpolicella
hr: Maslinova ulja iz veneto valpolicella
it: Olio di oliva Veneto Valpolicella, Veneto Valpolicella
nl: Olijfoliën uit Veneto Valpolicella, Olijfolies uit Veneto Valpolicella

en: Olive oils from Veneto Euganei e Berici
fr: Huile d'olive de Veneto Euganei e Berici
hr: Maslinova ulja iz Veneto Euganei e Berici
it: Olio di oliva Veneto Euganei e Berici, Veneto Euganei e Berici
nl: Olijfoliën uit Veneto Euganei e Berici, Olijfolies uit Veneto Euganei e Berici

en: Olive oils from Veneto del Grappa
fr: Huile d'olive de Veneto del Grappa
hr: Maslinova ulja iz veneto del grappa
it: Olio di oliva Veneto del Grappa, Veneto del Grappa
nl: Olijfoliën uit Veneto del Grappa, Olijfolies uit Veneto del Grappa

en: Olive oils from Vulture
fr: Huile d'olive de Vulture
hr: Maslinova ulja od supa
it: Olio di oliva Vulture, Vulture
nl: Olijfoliën uit Vulture, Olijfolies uit Vulture